Utah statutes.
48-3a-902.   Registration to do business in this state.

(1)  A foreign limited liability company may not do business in this state until it registers with the division under this chapter.

(2)  A foreign limited liability company doing business in this state may not maintain an action or proceeding in this state unless it is registered to do business in this state.

(3)  The failure of a foreign limited liability company to register to do business in this state does not impair the validity of a contract or act of the foreign limited liability company or preclude it from defending an action or proceeding in this state.

(4)  A limitation on the liability of a member or manager of a foreign limited liability company is not waived solely because the foreign limited liability company does business in this state without registering to do business in this state.

(5)  Subsections 48-3a-901(1) and (2) apply even if a foreign limited liability company fails to register under this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

